Massachusetts, session 194th, H3972.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 25 of the General Laws is hereby amended by adding the following
section:-
Section 24. (a) Not less than annually, the department shall publish a report of the
information collected pursuant to section 42A of chapter 40, section 58A of chapter 164, section
124F of said chapter 164 and section 11F of chapter 165. The department shall make the report
publicly available on its website.
(b) Annually, the department shall conduct a public information campaign to inform
customers of shut-off protections for financial hardship during the summer months and available
payment assistance programs. The department shall develop: (i) accessible, multi-lingual and
easily comprehensible web-based educational materials; and (ii) a robust virtual and in-person
statewide outreach program to educate low and moderate income communities on the protections
available to them under section 42A of chapter 40, section 58A of chapter 164, section 124F of
of 5

said chapter 164 and section 11F of chapter 165. Annually, the department shall collect and
report data on its outreach efforts including: (1) outlets used to disseminate the required
information; (2) the location, dates and number of attendees at in-person outreach events; (3) the
languages used in written outreach materials; and (4) the amount of people who registered for
arrearage management plans following the public outreach program. The department shall make
these reports available to the public on its website.
SECTION 2. Section 42A of chapter 40 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by adding the following paragraph:-
No city, town or water district shall, between May fifteenth and September thirtieth or
during a period in which the National Weather Service has issued an excessive heat warning or
advisory, refuse to restore or intentionally shut off the water service to any resident who cannot
pay an overdue charge because of financial hardship. Cities, towns and water districts shall
provide monthly reports to the department of public utilities of the following information: (i) the
number of households that would have otherwise lost water service if this paragraph did not
apply; (ii) the municipalities and zip codes of households that would have lost service; and (iii)
the estimated cost to the service provider of providing service that would have otherwise ceased.
The department of public utilities shall promulgate regulations, pursuant to chapter 30A, that
establish daily fines for any city, town or water district that violates this section, and may
promulgate other rules and regulations consistent with this section, pursuant to said chapter 30A,
as it deems reasonable and necessary to implement this section.
SECTION 3. Section 58A of chapter 164 of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby
amended by adding the following paragraph:-
of 5

No municipal lighting plant shall, between May fifteenth and September thirtieth or
during a period in which the National Weather Service has issued an excessive heat warning or
advisory, refuse to restore or intentionally shut off the electricity supply service to any customer
who cannot pay an overdue charge because of financial hardship, when such electric service is
used to provide temperature control, or otherwise protect residents and their property from
weather or climate conditions. Cities, towns and water districts shall provide monthly reports to
the department of public utilities of the following information: (i) the number of households that
would have otherwise lost electric service if this paragraph did not apply; (ii) the municipalities
and zip codes of households that would have lost service; and (iii) the estimated cost to the
service provider of providing service that would have otherwise ceased. The department shall
promulgate regulations, pursuant to chapter 30A, that establish daily fines for any municipal
light plant that violates this section. The department may promulgate other rules and regulations
consistent with this section, pursuant to said chapter 30A, as it deems reasonable and necessary
to implement this section.
SECTION 4. Section 124F of said chapter 164, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
striking out the last sentence.
SECTION 5. Said section 124F of said chapter 164, as so appearing, is hereby further
amended by adding the following 3 paragraphs:-
No electric company shall, between May fifteenth and September thirtieth or during a
period in which the National Weather Service has issued an excessive heat warning or advisory,
refuse to restore or shut off electric service to any residential customer who cannot pay an
overdue charge because of financial hardship, when such electric service is used to provide
of 5

temperature control, or otherwise protect residents and their property from weather or climate
conditions.
Electric companies shall provide monthly reports to the department of public utilities of
the following information: (i) the number of households that would have otherwise lost electric
service if this paragraph did not apply; (ii) the municipalities and zip codes of households that
would have lost service; and (iii) the estimated cost to the service provider of providing service
that would have otherwise ceased.
The department shall promulgate regulations, pursuant to chapter 30A, that establish
daily fines for any electric company that violates this section. The department may promulgate
other rules and regulations consistent with this section, pursuant to said chapter 30A, as it deems
reasonable and necessary to implement this section.
SECTION 6. Chapter 165 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after
section 11E the following section:-
Section 11F. (a) No corporation or company shall, between May fifteenth and September
thirtieth or during a period in which the National Weather Service has issued an excessive heat
warning or advisory, refuse to restore or intentionally shut off the water service to any residential
customer who cannot pay an overdue charge because of financial hardship.
(b) Corporations and companies shall provide monthly reports to the department of public
utilities of the following information: (i) the number of households that would have otherwise
lost water service if this paragraph did not apply; (ii) the municipalities and zip codes of
households that would have lost service; and (iii) the estimated cost to the service provider of
providing service that would have otherwise ceased.
of 5

(c) The department shall promulgate regulations, pursuant to chapter 30A, that establish
daily fines for any company violating this section. The department may promulgate other rules
and regulations consistent with this section, pursuant to said chapter 30A, as it deems reasonable
and necessary to implement this section.
of 5